hu: Tömítés típusa: Kompressziós/roppantógyűrűs; Peremes tömítés; Lapostömítés; Csőbilincs (bordás); O-gyűrű; Bepattintható csatlakozó belső tömítéssel; Tömítőanyag szükséges; Menettömítés (kúpos menet); Alátét/roppantó alátét; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de etanșare: Compresie/olivă; Etanșare conică; Garnitură; Colier de furtun (ștuț); Inel O; Conectare prin împingere cu etanșare internă; Necesită etanșant; Etanșare filet (filet conic); Șaibă/șaibă de etanșare; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta brtve: Kompresija/oliva; Konusna brtva; Brtva; Obujmica za crijevo (nazubljena); O-prsten; Utični priključak s unutarnjom brtvom; Potrebno je sredstvo za brtvljenje; Navojna brtva (konusni navoj); Podloška / drobljiva podloška; Ostalo
pt-BR: Vedação tipo: Compressão/oliva; Vedação de flange; Junta; Braçadeira de mangueira (espigão); Anel de vedação (O-ring); Engate rápido com vedação interna; Requer selante; Vedação de rosca (rosca cônica); Arruela/arruela de esmagamento; Outros
de: Dichtungstyp: Quetschverschraubung/Klemmring; Bördelverschraubung; Dichtung (Gasket); Schlauchschelle (Schlauchtülle); O-Ring; Steckverbindung mit Innendichtung; Dichtmittel erforderlich; Gewindedichtung (kegeliges Gewinde); Unterlegscheibe/Quetschdichtung; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de vedação: Compressão/oliva; Vedante abocardado; Junta; Abraçadeira de mangueira (farpa); O-ring; Ligação de encaixe com vedante interno; Requer selante; Vedante de rosca (rosca cónica); Anilha/anilha de esmagamento; Outro
nl: Afdichting type: Knel/knelring; Felsafdichting; Pakking; Slangklem (tule); O-ring; Insteekkoppeling met interne afdichting; Afdichtmiddel vereist; Schroefdraadafdichting (conische schroefdraad); Sluitring/koperen ring; Overig
ko: 씰 유형: 압축/올리브; 플레어 실; 개스킷; 호스 클램프(바브); O링; 내부 실이 있는 푸시 투 커넥트; 실런트 필요; 스레드 실(테이퍼 스레드); 와셔/크러시 와셔; 기타
sk-SK: Typ tesnenia: Kompresné/oliva; Kužeľové tesnenie; Ploché tesnenie; Hadicová spona (nátrubok); O-krúžok; Násuvné pripojenie s vnútorným tesnením; Vyžaduje sa tesniaci tmel; Závitové tesnenie (kónický závit); Podložka/deformačná podložka; Iné
cs: Typ těsnění: Kompresní / s kroužkem; Lemový spoj; Těsnění; Hadicová spona (nátrubek); O-kroužek; Zásuvné s vnitřním těsněním; Vyžaduje tmel; Závitové těsnění (kuželový závit); Podložka / deformační podložka; Jiné
es: Tipo de sello: Compresión/oliva; Sello abocinado; Junta; Abrazadera de manguera (espiga); Junta tórica; Conexión a presión con sello interno; Requiere sellador; Sello de rosca (rosca cónica); Arandela/arandela de compresión; Otro
ru: Тип уплотнения: Обжимное/оливка; Конусное уплотнение; Прокладка; Хомут для шланга (штуцер); Уплотнительное кольцо; Быстросъёмное соединение с внутренним уплотнением; Требуется герметик; Резьбовое уплотнение (коническая резьба); Шайба/деформируемая шайба; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta tesnila: Kompresijsko/olivno tesnilo; Konično tesnilo; Tesnilo; Cevna objemka (z zalustjo); O-obroček; Na potisk z notranjim tesnilom; Potrebna tesnilna masa; Tesnjenje navoja (konični navoj); Podložka / stisljiva podložka; Drugo
ja: シールタイプ: コンプレッション/オリーブ; フレアシール; ガスケット; ホースクランプ (バーブ); Oリング; プッシュイン (内部シール付き); シーラントが必要; スレッドシール (テーパーネジ); ワッシャー/クラッシュワッシャー; その他
th: ประเภทซีล: สวมอัด/ตาไก่; ซีลบานท่อ; ปะเก็น; เข็มขัดรัดสายยาง (เงี่ยง); โอริง; สวมเร็วแบบมีซีลภายใน; ต้องใช้วัสดุอุดรอยรั่ว; ซีลเกลียว (เกลียวเรียว); แหวนรอง/แหวนรองกันซึม; อื่นๆ
pl: Rodzaj uszczelnienia: Kompresyjne/pierścień zaciskowy (baryłka); Uszczelka stożkowa; Uszczelka; Opaska zaciskowa (na króciec); O-ring; Wtykowe z wewnętrznym uszczelnieniem; Wymagany uszczelniacz; Uszczelnienie gwintu (gwint stożkowy); Podkładka/podkładka zgniatana; Inny
bg-BG: Тип уплътнение: Компресионно/Сферично (олива); Конусно уплътнение; Гарнитура; Скоба за маркуч (щуцер); О-пръстен; Бърза връзка с вътрешно уплътнение; Изисква се уплътнител; Уплътнение за резба (конусовидна резба); Шайба/Дифтунга; Други
it: Tipo di tenuta: A compressione/ogiva; Guarnizione svasata; Guarnizione; Fascetta stringitubo (portagomma); O-ring; Ad innesto rapido con guarnizione interna; Sigillante necessario; A tenuta di filetto (filettatura conica); Rondella/rondella deformabile; Altro
zh-CN: 密封类型: 压缩/橄榄型; 扩口密封; 垫片; 软管夹（倒刺）; O 形环; 带有内部密封件的按压连接; 需要密封剂; 螺纹密封（锥形螺纹）; 垫圈/挤压垫圈; 其他
vi: Loại niêm phong: Nén/vành khuyên; Khớp nối loe; Vòng đệm; Kẹp ống (có ngạnh); Vòng chữ O; Nhấn để kết nối với phớt trong; Yêu cầu chất bịt kín; Ren bịt kín (ren hình nón); Vòng đệm/lông đền nát; Khác
zh-TW: 密封類型: 壓緊墊圈/橄欖型接頭; 擴口密封; 墊片; 軟管夾 (倒刺); O 型環; 快插式接頭 (含內部密封件); 需使用密封劑; 螺紋密封 (錐形螺紋); 墊圈/擠壓墊圈; 其他
fr: Type d’étanchéité: Compression/olive; Joint conique; Joint plat; Collier de serrage (cannelé); Joint torique; Raccord instantané avec joint interne; Produit d'étanchéité requis; Joint fileté (filetage conique); Rondelle/rondelle d'écrasement; Autre
nb: Tetningstype: Kompresjon/klemring; Flenspakning; Pakning; Slangeklemme (mothake); O-ring; Hurtigkobling med innvendig pakning; Krever tetningsmiddel; Gjengetetning (konisk gjenge); Skive/pakningsring; Annet
da: Tætningstype: Kompression/olivenring; Kravetætning; Pakning; Slangeklemme (modhage); O-ring; Push-to-connect med indvendig tætning; Kræver tætningsmiddel; Gevindtætning (konisk gevind); Spændeskive/knuseskive; Andet
sv: Tätningstyp: Klämring/kona; Flänstätning; Packning; Slangklämma (slangnippel); O-ring; Push-in med inre tätning; Tätningsmedel krävs; Gängtätning (konisk gänga); Bricka/tätningsbricka; Övrigt
tr: Sızdırmazlık tipi: Sıkıştırma/yüksük; Havşalı conta; Conta; Hortum kelepçesi (rakor); O-ring; İç contalı geçmeli bağlantı; Sızdırmazlık macunu gerekir; Diş sızdırmazlığı (konik diş); Pul/ezilebilir pul; Diğer
fi: Tiivisteen tyyppi: Puristusliitin/helmi; Laippatiiviste; Tasotiiviste; Letkunkiristin (kara); O-rengas; Pikaliitin sisäisellä tiivisteellä; Vaatii tiivisteainetta; Kierretiiviste (kartio); Aluslevy/tiivisterengas; Muu
en: Seal type: Compression/olive; Flare seal; Gasket; Hose clamp (barb); O-ring; Push-to-connect with internal seal; Sealant required; Thread seal (tapered thread); Washer/crush washer; Other
lt-LT: Sandarinimo tipas: Suspaudžiamas / alyvuogės formos; Platėjantis sandariklis; Tarpiklis; Žarnos sąvarža (su dantukais); O žiedas; Įstumiamoji jungtis su vidiniu sandarikliu; Būtinas hermetikas; Sriegio sandariklis (kūginis sriegis); Poveržlė / gniuždomoji poveržlė; Kita
el: Τύπος στεγανοποίησης: Συμπίεσης/δακτυλίδι; Στεγανοποίηση εκτόνωσης; Φλάντζα; Σφιγκτήρας σωλήνα (ρακόρ); O-ring; Κουμπωτό με εσωτερική στεγανοποίηση; Απαιτείται στεγανωτικό; Στεγανοποίηση σπειρώματος (κωνικό σπείρωμα); Ροδέλα/Ροδέλα σύνθλιψης; Άλλο